Maryland, session 2025, HB1114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
Subtitle 17. [Walter Sondheim Jr.] Public Service Internship Scholarship Program.
18–1701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Eligible student” means a junior, senior, or graduate student who attends an
institution of higher education in the State.
(c) “Internship” means a paid or an unpaid internship in the State with:
(1) An organization, an institution, an association, a society, or a
corporation that:
(i) Is exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) or (4) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986; and
(ii) Affords the student the opportunity to participate in and support
management functions, including board governance, executive leadership, financial
management, human resources, fundraising, or facilities management; or
(2) The State or any local government in the State.
(d) “Program” means the [Walter Sondheim Jr.] Public Service Internship
Scholarship Program.
(e) “Shriver Center” means the Shriver Center located at the University of
Maryland, Baltimore County.
18–1702.
(a) (1) There is a scholarship program known as the [Walter Sondheim Jr.]
Public Service Internship Scholarship Program in the State.
(2) THE PROGRAM CONSISTS OF AT LEAST THE FOLLOWING PUBLIC
SERVICE INTERN FELLOWSHIPS:
(I) THE GOVERNOR’S SUMMER INTERNSHIP PROGRAM;

HOUSE BILL 1114 3
(II) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
FELLOWS PROGRAM;
(III) THE SONDHEIM MARYLAND NONPROFIT LEADERSHIP
INTERNSHIP PROGRAM; AND
(IV) THE SONDHEIM PUBLIC SERVICE LAW FELLOWS
PROGRAM.
(b) The purpose of the Program is to assist college and graduate students to
explore public service career opportunities through internships.
(c) The Shriver Center shall administer the Program.
(d) An institution of higher education in the State may nominate eligible students
to participate in the Program on or before:
(1) January 1 of each year for summer and fall internships; and
(2) October 1 of each year for spring internships.
(e) Priority for participation in the Program shall be given to an eligible student
who:
(1) Is a resident of the State;
(2) Has demonstrated an interest in a career in public service; and
(3) Assists in providing:
(i) Legal services:
1. To low–income residents in the State who cannot afford
legal services; or
2. In a public service position;
(ii) Social work services to low–income residents in the State;
(iii) Nursing services in nursing shortage areas in the State as
defined in § 18–802 of this title; [or]
(iv) SERVICES IN TRANSPORTATION OR OTHER FIELDS WITHIN
STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT; OR

HOUSE BILL 1114
(V) Other services in the public or nonprofit sectors in which there is
a shortage of qualified practitioners to low–income or underserved residents or areas of the
State.
(f) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, for eligible students who
have agreed to serve in a public service internship, the Shriver Center shall award
scholarships on or before:
(i) January 15 of each year for spring internships;
(ii) May 1 of each year for summer internships; and
(iii) August 1 of each year for fall internships.
(2) Funds for the scholarships awarded under this subtitle shall be as
provided in the State budget.
(g) Subject to the availability of funds, the scholarship award under the Program
shall be at least $2,000 and no more than $5,000.
(h) The Shriver Center shall serve as a clearinghouse for public and nonprofit
entities that wish to hire public service interns participating in the Program.
18–1704.
(a) (1) Funds for the Program [may] SHALL be provided on an annual basis in
the State budget IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, THE GOVERNOR SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION FOR THE PROGRAM
THAT IS SUFFICIENT TO PROVIDE DOUBLE THE NUMBER OF INTERNSHIPS FUNDED
BY THE PROGRAM IN THE 2024–2025 SCHOOL YEAR.
(3) THE APPROPRIATION SHALL INCLUDE FUNDING FOR THE
UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE COUNTY TO ENSURE, AT A MINIMUM,
THAT:
(I) 36 INTERNS ARE ANNUALLY ENROLLED IN THE
GOVERNOR’S SUMMER INTERNSHIP PROGRAM;
(II) 20 INTERNS ARE ANNUALLY ENROLLED IN THE SONDHEIM
MARYLAND NONPROFIT LEADERSHIP INTERNSHIP PROGRAM; AND
(III) 10 INTERNS ARE ANNUALLY ENROLLED IN THE SONDHEIM
PUBLIC SERVICE LAW FELLOWS PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 1114 5
(4) THE APPROPRIATION SHALL INCLUDE FUNDING FOR THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION TO ENSURE, AT A MINIMUM, THAT
34 INTERNS ARE ANNUALLY ENROLLED IN THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION FELLOWS PROGRAM.
(b) The Governor may provide funding in the State budget to the Shriver Center
to administer the Program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.